Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1461
Housing code, defined.

Housing code shall include any law, ordinance, or governmental regulation concerning fitness for habitation, or the construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use, or appearance of any mobile home park, mobile home space, or dwelling unit. Minimum housing code shall be limited to those laws, resolutions, ordinances, or regulations, or portions thereof, dealing specifically with health and minimum standards of fitness for habitation.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 12.